Nebraska, session 109, LB145.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB145 LB145
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 2-958.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
2-958.02 (1) From funds available in the Noxious Weed and Invasive
Plant Species Assistance Fund, the director shall may administer a grant
program to assist local control authorities and other weed management
entities in the cost of implementing and maintaining noxious weed control
programs and in addressing special weed control problems as provided in
this section.
(2) The director shall receive applications by local control
authorities and weed management entities for assistance under this
subsection and, in consultation with the advisory committee created under
section 2-965.01, award grants for any of the following eligible
purposes:
(a) To conduct applied research to solve locally significant weed
management problems;
(b) To demonstrate innovative control methods or land management
practices which have the potential to reduce landowner costs to control
noxious weeds or improve the effectiveness of noxious weed control;
(c) To encourage the formation of weed management entities;
(d) To respond to introductions or infestations of invasive plants
that threaten or potentially threaten the productivity of cropland and
rangeland over a wide area;
(e) To respond to introductions and infestations of invasive plant
species that threaten or potentially threaten the productivity and
biodiversity of wildlife and fishery habitats on public and private
lands;
(f) To respond to special weed control problems involving weeds not
included in the list of noxious weeds promulgated by rule and regulation
of the director if the director has approved a petition to bring such
weeds under the county control program;
(g) To conduct monitoring or surveillance activities to detect, map,
-2-

LB145 LB145
2025 2025
or determine the distribution of invasive plant species and to determine
susceptible locations for the introduction or spread of invasive plant
species; and
(h) To conduct educational activities.
(3) The director shall select and prioritize applications for
assistance under subsection (2) of this section based on the following
considerations:
(a) The seriousness of the noxious weed or invasive plant problem or
potential problem addressed by the project;
(b) The ability of the project to provide timely intervention to
save current and future costs of control and eradication;
(c) The likelihood that the project will prevent or resolve the
problem or increase knowledge about resolving similar problems in the
future;
(d) The extent to which the project will leverage federal funds and
other nonstate funds;
(e) The extent to which the applicant has made progress in
addressing noxious weed or invasive plant problems;
(f) The extent to which the project will provide a comprehensive
approach to the control or eradication of noxious weeds or invasive plant
species as identified and listed by the Nebraska Invasive Species
Council;
(g) The extent to which the project will reduce or prevent the total
population or area of infestation of a noxious weed or invasive plant
species as identified and listed by the Nebraska Invasive Species
Council;
(h) The extent to which the project uses the principles of
integrated vegetation management and sound science; and
(i) Such other factors that the director determines to be relevant.
(4) The director shall receive applications for grants under this
subsection and shall award grants to recipients and programs eligible
-3-

LB145 LB145
2025 2025
under this subsection. Priority shall be given to grant applicants whose
proposed programs are consistent with vegetation management goals and
priorities and plans and policies of the Riparian Vegetation Management
Task Force established under section 2-970. Beginning in fiscal year
2025-26 2022-23, it is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate six
three million dollars annually for the management of vegetation within
the banks or flood plain of a natural stream. Such funds shall only be
used to pay for activities and equipment as part of vegetation management
programs that have as their primary objective improving conveyance of
streamflow in natural streams. Grants from funds appropriated as provided
in this subsection shall be disbursed only to weed management entities,
local weed control authorities, and natural resources districts whose
territory includes river basins, with priority given to river basins that
are the subject of an interstate compact or decree. The Game and Parks
Commission shall assist grant recipients in implementing grant projects
under this subsection, and interlocal agreements under the Interlocal
Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act shall be utilized whenever
possible in carrying out the grant projects.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve control
authorities of their duties and responsibilities under the Noxious Weed
Control Act or the duty of a person to control the spread of noxious
weeds on lands owned and controlled by him or her.
(6) The Department of Agriculture may adopt and promulgate necessary
rules and regulations to carry out this section.
(7) The director may annually apply for conservation funding from
the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United States
Department of Agriculture.
Sec. 2. Original section 2-958.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-